Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2964
Action without meeting.

(1) Unless prohibited by the articles of organization or bylaws, any action that may be taken by the board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents to action in a record.

(2) Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a director in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a record of consent from each director.

(3) The record of consent for any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 64.